Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4865.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 7130. (1) Baby food that is sold or offered for sale in
this state must meet the standards, action levels, regulatory
limits, or tolerances established by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for toxic elements.
(2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a food processor that
manufactures baby food that will be sold, offered for sale, or
distributed in this state shall test a representative sample of
each lot of baby food product for toxic elements at a proficient
laboratory. When conducting a test under this subsection, the
RMH H02114'25 (H-3) 3a87op


proficient laboratory shall quantify each toxic element to at least
6 micrograms of the toxic element per kilogram of food. A
proficient laboratory shall provide the food processor that
manufactured the baby food with the results of each test performed
under this subsection. The food processor that manufactured the
baby food shall make the results available to the department on
request.
(3) If a lot of baby food product tested under subsection (2)
includes a baby food product that was manufactured over a period of
more than 30 days, the representative sample must include a baby
food product that was manufactured in each 30-day period.
(4) A food processor that manufactures baby food may test
either bulk or packaged baby food products.
(5) If a baby food product exceeds the standards, action
levels, regulatory limits, or tolerances under subsection (1), the
food processor that manufactured the baby food shall dispose of the
baby food product. If the baby food product has already been sold
when the test results under subsection (2) are made known to the
food processor that manufactured the baby food and the baby food
product is found to exceed the standards, action levels, regulatory
limits, or tolerances under subsection (1), the food processor that
manufactured the baby food shall issue a recall for the baby food
product.
(6) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a food processor that
manufactures baby food shall make publicly available on the food
processor's website a list of each baby food product that is sold,
offered for sale, and distributed by the food processor and that
was subject to testing under subsection (2). The manufacturer's
website must also contain the following information:
RMH H02114'25 (H-3) 3a87op


(a) A link to a webpage that provides the test results under
subsection (2).
(b) A prominent statement that immediately precedes the link
under subdivision (a) that states "For information about toxic
element testing on this product.".
(7) The linked webpage described under subsection (6)(a) must
make the test results under subsection (2) available to users
without the need to provide a universal product code, lot number,
or proof of purchase and must provide the following information:
(a) Descriptive information that enables the accurate
identification of each baby food product. Descriptive information
may include, but is not limited to, the baby food product name, a
photo of the baby food product, the universal product code, if any,
and the size, lot, or batch numbers.
(b) The name and level of each toxic element present. This
information must remain available on the food processor's webpage
described under subsection (6) for the entire shelf life of the
baby food product plus 1 month.
(c) A link to the United States Food and Drug Administration's
website that provides the most recent guidance and information
regarding the health effects of the identified toxic elements on
fetuses, infants, children, and individuals who are pregnant,
planning to become pregnant, or breastfeeding.
(8) Beginning January 1, 2027, and in addition to any other
labeling requirement, a food processor that manufactures baby food
shall include on the label of each baby food product sold, offered
for sale, or distributed in this state both of the following:
(a) A QR code or other machine-readable code that links to the
food processor's webpage described under subsection (6).
RMH H02114'25 (H-3) 3a87op


(b) A statement that reads "For information about toxic
element testing on this product, scan the code.".
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Baby food" means food packaged in jars, pouches, tubes,
or boxes that is represented or purported to be specifically for
babies and young children who are less than 2 years of age. Baby
food does not include infant formula as that term is defined in
section 201 of the federal act, 21 USC 321.
(b) "Proficient laboratory" means a laboratory that meets the
following requirements:
(i) Is accredited under the standards of the International
Organization for Standardization and the International
Electrotechnical Commission.
(ii) Uses an analytical method that is at least as sensitive as
the analytical method described in section 4.7 of the document
titled "Elemental Analysis Manual (EAM) for Food and Related
Products" published by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(iii) Demonstrates proficiency through an independent
proficiency test by achieving a z-score that is less than or equal
to plus or minus 2 for each identified toxic element.
(c) "Representative sample" means a sample that consists of a
number of units that are drawn based on rational criteria, such as
random sampling, and are intended to ensure that the sample
accurately portrays the material being sampled.
(d) "Toxic elements" includes arsenic, cadmium, lead, and
mercury.
Final Page
RMH H02114'25 (H-3) 3a87op